Tennessee, session 114, SB0563.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-101-502(b), is amended by
deleting "a local board of education, the achievement school district, or the state board of
education" and substituting "a local board of education, the achievement school district, or the
Tennessee public charter school commission".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0563
002068
- 1 -